New York, session 2025-2026, A3022.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (f) and (g) of subdivision 1 of section 627 of 2 the executive law, as added by section 18 of part A-1 of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2010, are amended and a new paragraph (h) is added to read 4 as follows: 5 (f) expedited determination of claims with respect to a livery opera- 6 tor within thirty days of the date upon which the claim was accepted for 7 filing, as well as standards for awards of loss of earnings or support 8 granted pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with 9 the provisions of this subdivision and subdivision three of section six 10 hundred thirty-one of this article. Each award for loss of earnings 11 pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with this 12 subdivision made with respect to a claim involving a livery operator 13 assault victim shall be for such period of time as the office determines 14 that the livery operator assault victim is unable to work and has lost 15 earnings as a result of such assault, in an amount not to exceed twenty 16 thousand dollars. Such award shall be distributed in increments of five 17 hundred dollars per week. Each award for loss of support pursuant to 18 rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with this subdivision 19 made with respect to a claim involving a livery operator homicide victim 20 shall be in the amount of twenty thousand dollars, distributed in incre- 21 ments of five hundred dollars per week; [and] 22 (g) provisions for any claimant to submit an additional claim for any 23 loss of earnings or support in excess of the amount awarded pursuant to 24 rules and regulations in accordance with paragraph (f) of this subdivi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04836-01-5 A. 3022 2 1 sion, or an additional claim for any other award pursuant to rules and 2 regulations promulgated in accordance with this article, in each case 3 pursuant to and in accordance with the other provisions of this article 4 or any rules and regulations promulgated in accordance thereof and 5 subject to any applicable maximum award limitations contained in this 6 article[.]; and 7 (h) priority for applications and expedited determination of claims 8 for a human trafficking victim, as defined in section four hundred 9 eighty-three-aa of the social services law, who wishes to remove perma- 10 nent marks that were part of the trafficking of such victim, including 11 but not limited to, tattoos, markings, brandings, or other symbols or 12 insignia. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.